District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.66

Services to certified business enterprise.

(a)

The Department shall provide the following services to certified business enterprises:

(1)

Specialized programs to assist certified business enterprises in securing capital and repairing damaged credit;

(2)

Informational seminars on securing credit and loans; and

(3)

Access to non-traditional financing sources, as well as traditional lending sources.

(b)

The Department shall:

(1)

Develop a catalog of on-line survival and growth tools and resources that certified business enterprises can access through the Internet or other organizations;

(2)

Enter into a memorandum of understanding with a third-party vendor to provide expert consulting and education to assist certified businesses enterprises at risk of failure, including certified business enterprises that are considering filing for bankruptcy;

(3)

Develop a formal listing of financing options for business enterprises;

(4)

Deliver services that assist workers who become unemployed due to economic fluctuations to begin new businesses; and

(5)

Enter into a memorandum of understanding with a third-party vendor to provide one-on-one counseling with potential borrowers to improve financial presentations to lenders.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2366
as added May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-159, § 2(g), 57 DCR 3006